Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.155

Certain plans 2 and 3 normal costs—Minimum basic employer contribution rates.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2011, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This minimum rate, when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any contribution rate required to amortize past gain-sharing distributions in plan 3.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plan 2 normal cost as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the public safety employees' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plan 2 normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plan 2 normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.

(3) Beginning September 1, 2011, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This minimum rate, when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any contribution rate required to amortize past gain-sharing distributions in plan 3.

(4) Beginning September 1, 2011, a minimum contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This minimum rate, when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any contribution rate required to amortize past gain-sharing distributions in plan 3.

(5) A minimum contribution rate is established for the plan 2 normal cost as part of the basic employer and state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. The council may not adopt changes to the minimum contribution rate for plan 2 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system under subsection (6) of this section. On June 30th of each even-numbered year, if the funded status of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as measured by the most recent completed actuarial valuation performed by the office of the state actuary is:

(a) Less than 105 percent, then the minimum contribution rate for the employer and state normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund 100 percent of the plan 2 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method;

(b) Greater than or equal to 105 percent and less than 110 percent, then the minimum contribution rate for the employer and state normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund 90 percent of the plan 2 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method; or

(c) Greater than or equal to 110 percent, then the minimum contribution rate for the employer and state normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund 80 percent of the plan 2 employer normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.

(6) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of these minimum contribution rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. The minimum contribution rates in this section, including changes adopted by the council, shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

[ 2022 c 125 s 4; 2009 c 561 s 6; 2006 c 365 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 561: See note following RCW 41.45.010.

Effective date—2006 c 365: See note following RCW 41.45.020.